South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4342.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Restricted dental school faculty licenses, exemption SECTION 1.    Section 40-15-175 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 40-15-175.    (A) The State Board of Dentistry may issue a restricted instructor's license to a dentist who: (1) holds a valid license to practice dentistry in another state, country, or territory; (2) has met or been approved under the credentialing standards of the Medical University of South Carolina College of Dental Medicine or at a board-recognized, hospital-based residency program which must be situated in this State and with which the person is to be affiliated; (3) has successfully completed: (a) the final two years of a program leading to the doctor of dental surgery degree (D.D.S.) or doctor of dental medicine degree (D.M.D.) at an accredited dental school approved by the board; (b) at least a two-year Commission on Dental Accreditation (CODA) approved advanced education program in a dental specialty recognized by the American Dental Association; or (c) has successfully completed at least a two-year CODA-approved advanced education program in general dentistry; (4) has not been refused a license or had a license revoked in this State or another state, country, or territory; (5) passes an examination on jurisprudence as prescribed by the board; and (6) is teaching dental medicine in South Carolina full-time at the Medical University of South Carolina College of Dental Medicine or at a board-recognized, hospital-based residency program situated in this State. (B) The board may waive the requirements found in subsection (A)(3) if the applicant has a full-time academic faculty appointment at the rank of assistant professor or greater in a dental school in this State accredited by CODA. (C) A dentist with a restricted instructor's license is authorized to practice at or on behalf of the Medical University of South Carolina College of Dental Medicine or at a board-recognized, hospital-based residency program situated in this State. The holder of a restricted instructor's license may practice general dentistry or in his area of specialty, but only in a clinic or office affiliated with the dental school or with a hospital-based residency program. A restricted instructor's license issued to a faculty member under this section terminates immediately and automatically, without any further action by the board, if the holder ceases to be a faculty member at the dental school or at a board-recognized, hospital-based residency program in this State. (D) A restricted instructor's license must be renewed biennially in accordance with procedures and fees as established by the board in regulation. (E) A dentist holding a restricted instructor's license issued pursuant to this section is subject to the provisions of this chapter and regulations promulgated under this chapter unless otherwise provided for in this section. The board may revoke a restricted instructor's license for a violation of this chapter or regulations promulgated under this chapter or if the holder fails to supply the board, within ten days of its request, with information as to his or her current status and activities in the teaching program. Restricted veterinary medicine school faculty licenses SECTION 2.    Chapter 69, Title 40 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 40-69-245.    (A) The South Carolina State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners may issue a restricted faculty license to practice veterinary medicine to an applicant who is a member of the faculty at a school of veterinary medicine in this State accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association if the applicant has satisfied one of the following: (1) is licensed as a veterinarian in another state or territory of the United States; or (2) is a graduate of a school or college of veterinary medicine accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association or holds a certificate issued by the Education Commission of Foreign Veterinary Graduates or credentials issued by a credentialing entity approved by the board or a related doctoral degree has been granted a Doctor of Veterinary Medicine or equivalent degree from a veterinary college or university. (B) The board may waive the requirements found in subsection (A) if the applicant has a full-time academic faculty appointment at the rank of assistant professor or greater at a veterinarian college or university in this State accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association. (C) A faculty license entitles the holder to practice veterinary medicine while engaged in the performance of his or her official duties as a faculty member only and is confined to clinical, hospital, or field services units, of the school of veterinary medicine where employed. (D) The board may not license an applicant who has been refused a license or has a revoked license, has relinquished a license, or is currently under suspension or probation in this State or another state, country, or territory. Nothing prevents the board from denying an applicant a restricted faculty license for grounds set forth in South Carolina Code Section 40-1-110. (E) The license issued pursuant to this section shall be cancelled by the board upon receipt of information that the holder of the license has left or has otherwise been discontinued from faculty employment at a college or school of veterinary medicine in South Carolina. (F) An applicant must file an application, including any other required documentation and pay a license fee. The initial license fee is equivalent to the initial application fee required of veterinary applicants. The license fee is subject to change in regulation in accordance with the provisions of Section 40-1-50, as added to the S.C. Code by this act. The department may establish and adjust application fees, license renewal fees, late fees, reinstatement fees, and other related fees in regulation. The department shall only establish fees at levels which are adequate to ensure the continued operation of the regulatory program established in this act and may not set or maintain fees that substantially exceed this need. (G) The license issued pursuant to this section is subject to requirements as set forth in South Carolina Code Sections 40-69-250 and 40-69-255. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 5th day of March, 2026. Approved the 9th day of March, 2026. __________